Utah statutes.
53-2a-806.   Place of legislative session.

(1)  If the governor or the governor's interim successor declares a state of emergency or finds that a state of emergency is imminent, and the governor or the interim successor determines that the prescribed place of session is unsafe, the governor may change the place of session to any place in Utah that the governor considers safe and convenient.

(2)  Each legislator shall proceed to the place of session as expeditiously as practicable.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

